Maine, session 132, LD928.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §3028-A, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 145, §2 and
affected by §3, is amended to read:
11. Removal of obstructions. If the municipal officers or county commissioners have
declared a town way discontinued by abandonment and have retained a public easement in
the abandoned town way under this section for at least 15 years, the municipality, county
commissioners or an abutter on the way may not gate, bar or otherwise obstruct the town
way. If the municipal officers or county commissioners have declared a town way
discontinued by abandonment and have retained a public easement in the abandoned town
way under this section for less than 15 years, the municipality, county commissioners or
an abutter on the way, acting with the written permission of the municipal officers or county
commissioners, may remove any gates, bars or other obstructions in the town way.